Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2355
Deposit of will with court in testator's lifetime.

A will may be deposited by the testator or his agent with the court having jurisdiction of the county of his residence for safekeeping, under rules of the court. The will shall be kept confidential. During the testator's lifetime a deposited will shall be delivered only to him or to a person authorized in writing signed by him to receive the will. A conservator or guardian may be allowed to examine a deposited will of a protected testator under procedures designed to maintain the confidential character of the will to the extent possible, and to assure that it will be resealed and left on deposit after the examination. Upon being informed of the testator's death, the court shall notify any person designated to receive the will and deliver it to him on request; or the court may deliver the will to some other appropriate court.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 77, UPC § 2-901.